Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1135
District; adopt rules and regulations.

Each district may adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as shall be necessary to carry out its responsibilities under the Nebraska Chemigation Act. The rules and regulations of a district shall be subject to approval by the director.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 35.